California statutes. Water Code
A district may enter into an agreement with any municipality within the district whereby any work or improvement constructed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be transferred to the municipality for operation and maintenance. The power to make such an agreement is conditioned upon a finding by the board that the residents of the district would be better served by such municipal operation and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definition of Improvement Act Terms [36456. - 36456.9.]

36456.

As used in the laws referred to in this chapter the terms therefrom set forth in this article refer for the purposes of this chapter to that which this article states each respectively refers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.1.

“City” refers to the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.2.

“City council” or “legislative body” refers to the board of directors of the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.3.

“Mayor” refers to the president of the board of directors of the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.4.

“Clerk” refers to the secretary of the board of directors of the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.5.

“Council chambers” refers to the place designated by the board of directors of the water district for holding its regular meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.6.

“Treasurer” refers to the treasurer of the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.7.

“Superintendent of streets” or “street superintendent” and “city engineer” refer to the engineer of the water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.8.

“Right-of-way” refers to any parcel of land through which a right-of-way has been granted to the water district for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36456.9.

All words relating to municipal officers and matters refer to the corresponding officers of water districts and matters under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Engineer of Work [36457. - 36457.3.]

36457.

The board may appoint officers other than the engineer, without compensation, as the officer to perform any or all of the duties conferred upon the street superintendent or city engineer in any law referred to in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36457.1.

The board may appoint an engineer of work, in which event the duties to be performed by the city engineer as set forth in any law referred to in this chapter shall be performed by the engineer of work, whose compensation and expenses shall constitute an incidental expense in the cost of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36457.2.

The board may provide that the work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the engineer of work, that the materials used shall comply with his specifications and be to his satisfaction, and that he shall make and sign the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36457.3.

The contract shall be entered into by the engineer, and the assessment and warrant, when confirmed, shall be recorded in the office of the engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessments and Bonds for Agricultural Water Delivery Facilities [36458. - 36458.1.]

36458.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for facilities for delivery primarily of agricultural water supplies, in accordance with the provisions of any of the improvement acts mentioned in this chapter, may extend over a period not exceeding 24 years from the 2nd day of January next succeeding the next September 1st following their date and may provide that the first maturity date shall be the 2nd day of January, three years succeeding the next September 1st following their date and shall be paid in equal annual installments on January 2nd thereafter until the whole principal amount with accrued interest is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36458.1.

In determining the amount of the assessments to be levied and bonds to be issued pursuant to this chapter, the board of directors may include bond interest for facilities for delivery primarily of agricultural water supplies estimated to accrue during the period of construction, but not exceeding three years from the date of issuance of said bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.5. DISTRIBUTION DISTRICTS IN WATER DISTRICTS [36460. - 36543.]



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [36460. - 36499.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition for Formation [36460. - 36466.]

36460.

Land within a water district, which need not be contiguous, may be formed into a distribution district for the purpose of contracting with the United States, pursuant to federal reclamation laws, or for the purpose of contracting with the district for the construction of a distribution system separate from or supplemental to the works of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36461.

As used in this part, “federal reclamation law” shall mean the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902 (32 Stats. 388), and all acts amendatory thereof or supplemental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36462.

The formation of a distribution district may be proposed and the petition therefor shall be signed by two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed distribution district appearing on the last equalized assessment roll of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36463.

A petition for the formation of a distribution district shall contain all of the following:

(a) Statement of the plans of the proposed distribution system.

(b) Description of the land in the proposed distribution district.

(c) Names of the owners of all land within the proposed distribution district with their last known addresses.

(d) Description of the land owned in the proposed distribution district by each owner, which shall be according to the next preceding equalized assessment book of the district.

(e) Signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36464.

The petition, all proceedings in reference to it, the distribution district, and the land in it shall be designated by a number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36465.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36466.

A petition to form a distribution district shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans and Estimate of Assessment [36470. - 36472.]

36470.

Upon receipt of a petition to form a distribution district the board shall cause a survey to be made of the proposed distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36471.

If the survey shows that the improvements are feasible, the board shall cause to be prepared the following:

(a) Plans and specifications of the proposed distribution system.

(b) An estimate of the cost of the proposed distribution system, which may include an amount not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the aggregate cost of the proposed distribution system, to create a reserve fund to be used and applied as additional security for the payment of any sums due under a contract with the United States or the district for the payment of the cost of the proposed distribution system.

(c) Statement of the proposed assessment which probably will be necessary to meet the distribution district’s obligation to the United States or the district under the proposed contract or contracts, apportioned to each tract of land in the proposed distribution district as the tracts appear on the last equalized district assessment book and to district-owned land in the proposed distribution district, whether or not it appears on the last equalized district assessment book, which apportionment shall be according to the benefits that will accrue to each tract by virtue of the construction of the distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36472.

The plans and specifications, estimate of cost and the statement of the proposed assessment shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing on Formation [36480. - 36484.]

36480.

After the filing of the formation petition, the plans and specifications, the estimate of cost and statement of the proposed assessment, the board shall give notice of a hearing upon the petition, which said notice shall also state that the hearing is called to determine whether or not the special assessment should be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36481.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by all of the following:

(a) Posting a notice in three public places within the proposed distribution district.

(b) Publication of the notice once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

(c) Mailing a copy of the notice to the last known address of all of the owners of land in the proposed distribution district to the addresses appearing on the last equalized assessment role of the district.

The notices shall be posted and mailed not less than 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36482.

At the hearing the board shall hear any objections coming before it to any of the following:

(a) The petition.

(b) The formation of the distribution district.

(c) The land to be included within the distribution district.

(d) The plans and specifications.

(e) The estimate of cost.

(f) The proposed assessment.

(g) The apportionment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36483.

At the hearing the board shall make any changes in reference to matters set forth in Section 36482 as it considers proper. The board may exclude any part of the land described in the petition from the proposed distribution district and may include additional land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36484.

If any additional land is included within the proposed distribution district, the hearing shall be continued and the owners of the added land given personal notice of not less than 20 days of the addition of the land to the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Formation and Assessment [36490. - 36499.]

36490.

Regardless of any findings made by the board, if more than one-third in number of the holders of title to land within the proposed distribution district object at the hearing to its formation or to the levy of the proposed assessment, the board shall deny the petition and no further proceeding shall be had on it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36491.

If at the hearing the board finds that it would not be for the best interests of the district to form the distribution district, the board shall order the proceedings dismissed without prejudice to their renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36492.

If the board finds that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed distribution district to form the distribution district, it shall make and enter in its minutes a final order:

(a) Approving the petition.

(b) Forming the distribution district.

(c) Providing that the assessment shall be levied each year in the same manner as district assessments to meet the obligations of the contract with the United States under federal reclamation laws or the obligations of the contract with the district.

(d) Apportioning the assessment to the land in the distribution district according to benefits.

(e) Describing the land in the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36493.

Assessments levied for the purpose of meeting obligations accruing under a contract with the United States pursuant to the reclamation laws or under a contract with the district, shall be payable in the same manner and at the same time as district assessments, and such distribution district assessments shall be made in the number and amount sufficient to meet the obligations accruing under such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36494.

The secretary shall cause a certified copy of the order creating the distribution district to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any land of the distribution district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36495.

The assessment, and each installment of it, shall be and remain a lien on the land in the distribution district in the same manner as, and be a part of, the annual assessment of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36496.

All lands of the distribution district shall remain jointly liable for all obligations accruing to the United States or accruing to the district under any contract between the distribution district and the United States or any contract between the distribution district and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36497.

Upon a change or resubdivision upon the assessment book of the district of any parcel of land in a distribution district, the board upon its own initiative or upon petition of the owner of the parcel so changed or resubdivided, may reapportion the distribution district assessment upon the parcel, and the order of reapportionment shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36498.

If the actual amount to be paid by the distribution district to the United States or to the district under the contract to be executed is substantially less than the estimated amount, the assessment may be reduced proportionately on each parcel by recomputing it, based on the actual amount to be repaid as set forth in said contract. The reapportionment or a statement that the assessment on each parcel has been reduced by a designated percentage shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36499.

Installments of assessments levied on district owned land becoming due while the land is still owned by the district shall be paid by the district. Conveyance of such lands into private ownership shall not release the lien thereon of the assessment and the unpaid installments of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion and Exclusion of Land [36500. - 36514.]



  ARTICLE 1. Inclusion of Land [36500. - 36502.]

36500.

If at any time it is desired to include additional land in a distribution district, a petition for inclusion signed by the owners of the land to be included and by two-thirds in number of the holders of title to the land in the distribution district may be filed with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36501.

The inclusion petition shall describe the land in the distribution district as enlarged by the proposed inclusions and give the names and addresses of the owners of the additional land in substantially the same manner as in the original petition for forming a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36502.

The same proceedings shall be had on the distribution district inclusion petition as upon the original petition for the formation of a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusion of Land [36510. - 36514.]

36510.

At any time before a district has incurred any indebtedness or obligation, or after all indebtedness and obligations have been discharged, two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to an area of land in the distribution district, as appears on the last equalized assessment roll, desiring to be excluded therefrom may by verified petition filed with the board of the district, request that the area be excluded from the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36511.

The secretary of the district, upon the filing of the petition, shall examine it and if, in his opinion, the petition has been signed by the requisite number of landowners, he shall set it for hearing at the first regular meeting of the board of the district held after the expiration of 30 days after the filing of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36512.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the time and place of hearing to be posted for a period of two weeks next preceding the hearing (a) in three public places in the area requested to be excluded, and (b) in three public places in the area of the distribution district which has not been requested to be excluded, and to be published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which any portion of the distribution district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36513.

At the time and place of the hearing, anyone interested in the petition for exclusion may appear before the board of the district and urge or oppose its approval. After the hearing, if the board of the district determines that it is for the best interests of the distribution district that the land requested to be excluded, or any portion thereof, should be excluded, the board of the district shall make an order excluding the land, or portion thereof, and cause it to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the excluded land is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36514.

All expenses incurred in connection with a petition to exclude lands from a distribution district shall be paid by the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Functioning of Distribution Districts [36520. - 36531.]



  ARTICLE 1. Distribution District Management [36520. - 36525.]

36520.

In a district containing a distribution district the board and all of the officers of the district each respectively has all of the rights, powers and privileges as to the distribution district, its land, and the proceedings in relation to the distribution district that each respectively has for the district of which the distribution district is a part, including the right of the district to acquire, own, hold and dispose of property, and to contract in the name of the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36521.

The board may also hold or dispose of property used or acquired in connection with the distribution district in the name of the directors and their successors in office as trustees for the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36522.

The board of the district may in lieu in whole or in part of levying assessments for repayment of construction costs under a contract with the United States or with the district, fix and collect charges for the use of water or for any other service furnished by means of the distribution system in the same manner and with the same effect as charges are made and collected by districts for the use of water or for services. Such charges may be in excess of charges made and collected by the district for the use of water or for services in other areas of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36523.

The board of the district may provide for any maintenance and operation of the distribution system of a distribution district that may be required by the provisions of the contract between the distribution district and the United States under the federal reclamation laws or under the contract between the distribution district and the district, from funds of the district in lieu of levying further distribution district assessments for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36524.

The board of the district may provide for any maintenance and operation of the distribution system of a distribution district that may be required by the provisions of the contract between the distribution district and the United States under the federal reclamation laws or under the contract between the distribution district and the district, from funds raised by charges which are fixed and collected for the use of water or for any other such service furnished by means of the distribution system, in the same manner and with the same effect as charges are made and collected by district for the use of water or for services. Such charges may be in addition to other charges made by the district for the furnishing of water or other services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36525.

A district may issue distribution district warrants signed by its president and secretary from receipts of distribution district assessments and charges in such amounts and to the United States, the district or such persons as may be required to carry out the provisions of a contract between a distribution district and the United States, executed under the federal reclamation laws, or a contract between the distribution district and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Actions and Proceedings [36530. - 36531.]

36530.

All acts, proceedings, conclusions, and findings of fact, including the levy of assessments or charges, by a board of a district concerning a distribution district herein shall be conclusive except in an action or proceeding instituted within six months after the acts, proceedings, conclusions, or findings were had or made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36531.

An action to determine the validity of an assessment may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Dissolution of Distribution Districts [36540. - 36543.]

36540.

At any time prior to incurring any indebtedness or obligation, or upon the full payment of all indebtedness or obligations of a distribution district a petition, signed and acknowledged by not less than the number of owners of land constituting the distribution district required to sign a petition to form the distribution district, may be filed with the board requesting that the distribution district be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36541.

A hearing on dissolution shall be had in the same manner and after the same notice as is required for the formation of a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36542.

The board may, after the hearing, order the distribution district dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

36543.

The order of dissolution shall be recorded in the same manner as the order forming the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. ASSESSMENTS [36550. - 37186.]



  CHAPTER 1. Assessment [36550. - 36611.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annual Estimate [36550. - 36560.]

36550.

As used in this part “board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36551.

As used in this part “bond” means a general obligation bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36552.

Between the date on which the district was formed and 90 days thereafter, and between those dates annually thereafter, the board shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors an estimate of the sum required by the district to discharge all of its obligations:

(a) That are unpaid and matured at that date.

(b) That will mature during the next year.

(c) That it is probable will be incurred and mature during the next
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   Effective September 18, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36553.

The annual estimate shall specify the portion thereof which will be required for the payment of bonds and of the interest on bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36554.

The annual estimate may include an amount to be determined by the board but not to exceed 1 percent of the total assessed value of the land, which sum shall be apportioned to the bond fund and used for the redemption or purchase of unmatured bonds or for the creation of a sinking fund to pay bonds as they become due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36555.

The board shall deduct from the annual estimate the amount it anticipates will be derived from sales of water by the district and be available as needed to discharge its obligations during the next year, and this amount shall not be included in the sum required to be raised by assessment for that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36556.

If, at the time any annual estimate is required to be filed, the board anticipates that the receipts from all sources will be sufficient and available as needed to pay all the district’s obligations due and payable during the next year, the board, in lieu of filing the estimate, may so report to the board of supervisors and no assessment shall be levied for that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36557.

Immediately upon the formation of the district the board may levy and collect the sum of fifty cents ($0.50) per acre for each acre of land. The money collected shall be used by the board to pay the preliminary expenses incurred in forming the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36558.

The board may from time to time by resolution provide for a district fiscal year to commence and end at the dates specified in such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

36559.

If a fiscal year is adopted pursuant to Section 36558, in lieu of submitting the annual estimate at the time set forth in Section 36552, the board may, by resolution, establish that the annual estimate required by Section 36552 shall be filed within 90 days from the beginning of the district’s fiscal year so adopted. In that event, the annual assessment made pursuant to Section 36570 shall be made between the first day of the fiscal year and 90 days thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 717, Sec. 2.   Effective September 18, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36560.

Assessments that are imposed pursuant to this part and Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 37200) to pay the principal of, and interest on, general obligation bonds of a district or which are issued by a district for an improvement district are ad valorem taxes that are imposed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and are not, therefore, subject to the procedures and approval process of Article XIIID of the California Constitution. This section shall not be
 construed as declaring that any other type of assessment is either exempt from, or subject to, the procedures and approval process of Article XIIID of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 566, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment Book [36570. - 36579.]

36570.

Between the date on which the district was formed and 90 days thereafter, and between those dates in each succeeding year, the assessor shall assess all land, except that if all funds required to be raised are raised other than by assessment, no assessment need be levied and no assessment book need be prepared or equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36571.

All of the land shall be assessed at its full cash value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36572.

The assessor shall, within the time for assessing the land, file with the clerk of the board of supervisors an assessment book with appropriate headings in which shall be listed all of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36573.

The assessment book shall contain:

(a) The name of the holder of title to the land if known, and if unknown, that fact shall be stated.

(b) A description of the land sufficient to identify it.

(c) The cash value of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36574.

If the district is contained in more than one county the assessment book shall be prepared with a separate part in a separate volume for the land in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36575.

In lieu of assessing the land, as aforesaid, the board may direct the assessor to, and the assessor shall thereupon adopt as the cash value of the land, and shall insert in the assessment book as such cash value the value of the land as the same appears on the assessment roll of the county in which the land is situated, except that any value of rights to minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances underlying the land which may be included in the assessed value of the land on the assessment roll of such county, shall be deducted by the assessor from such assessed value and the remainder of such assessed value shall be adopted as the cash value of the land, and
 inserted in the assessment book as such cash value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

36576.

Notwithstanding Section 36571, until such time as a district which has not theretofore delivered water for any purpose puts into operation facilities for the delivery of water, the board may levy a special assessment of an equal amount upon each acre of land within the district sufficient to defray all expenses as estimated by the board to be incurred for the general benefit of the district during the period in which facilities for the delivery of water primarily for agricultural purposes are being planned and constructed. In no event shall such equal amount assessment exceed three dollars ($3) per acre per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

36577.

In lieu of assessing all land pursuant to its cash value as set forth in Section 36571 or the county assessed value pursuant to Section 36575, the board may provide for an alternative method of valuation based upon the benefits bestowed on the land by directing the assessor to, and the assessor shall thereafter, adopt as the assessed value of all land in the district an amount determined by the board pursuant to Section 36578.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

36578.

If the board elects to have land within the district valued pursuant to Section 36577, the following procedures shall apply:

(a) Prior to its adoption of a valuation based upon benefits under this section, the board shall hold a public hearing at which owners of property or residents of the district may appear and be heard. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the secretary by posting notice thereof at the district office at least 20 days prior to the hearing, stating the purpose, time, and place of hearing, together with publication thereof in a newspaper of general circulation in
 each county in which the district has land in accordance with Section 6063 of the Government Code. The notice shall also be mailed to each landowner as shown in the records of the district at least 20 days prior to the hearing.

(b) At the hearing, evidence shall be introduced by the assessor and may be introduced by landowners or residents within the district as to the valuation schedules to be adopted by the board.

(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, or as it may be continued from time to time, the board shall adopt a schedule of valuations on a per acre basis, or fractions thereof, for agricultural land and on a parcel, acreage, or square foot basis for nonagricultural land. The schedule shall reflect the proportional benefits bestowed on the property assessed by the operation of the district. Land may be classified as to direct or indirect receipt of district benefit,
 irrigated or nonirrigated use, commercial, industrial, or residential use, or any other method which reflects the benefits received.

(d) Upon the board’s adoption of a schedule of valuations, the duties and responsibilities of the board of supervisors and clerk of the board of supervisors established in this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 36725) shall be carried out by the board and secretary of the district, respectively.

(e) There shall be no allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to any district that utilizes the provisions of Section 36577. Each district utilizing Section 36577 shall notify the county auditor pursuant to Section 100 of the Revenue and Taxation Code that the district does not desire to receive a property tax allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 789, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

36579.

If the board elects to have land within the district valued pursuant to Sections 36577 and 36578, the board may also provide for more than one schedule of valuations based upon different benefits bestowed on the land and the assignment of more than one valuation to the lands in the district and the levy of a separate assessment for the different benefits bestowed on the land. If the board elects to provide for separate valuations for separate benefits pursuant to this section, this chapter shall apply to the separate assessments. The assessment book shall include all assessments, but the assessor may, at his or her option,
 prepare separate assessment statements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 717, Sec. 3.   Effective September 18, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Land Escaping Assessment [36590. - 36590.]

36590.

If any land is not charged with its portion of any assessment or if the assessment on any land is adjudged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, that land shall at any subsequent assessment hearing be assessed, in addition to the then current assessment, by the board of supervisors in a sum which bears the same proportion to the total amount of the former assessment as its then assessed valuation bears to the total amount of the assessed valuation placed on all the land at the time the former assessment was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hearing on Assessment [36600. - 36611.]

36600.

Within 60 days after the estimate and the assessment book have been filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, the board of supervisors shall fix a time for a hearing, not less than 22 days and not more than 40 days thereafter, at which the board of supervisors acting as a board of equalization shall meet and hear any objections to the assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36601.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall give notice of the hearing by publication once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, which notice shall state each of the following:

(a) The time and place of the hearing, which shall be the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors.

(b) The time and place where the assessment book may be inspected by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36602.

The first publication of the notice shall be at least 15 days prior to the date fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36603.

From the time of calling the hearing and until the hearing is held, the assessment book shall be open to public inspection at the office of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36604.

At the hearing the board of supervisors, meeting as a board of equalization, shall:

(a) Hear all objections presented to it regarding the correctness of any assessment.

(b) Hear all testimony relevant to the objections.

(c) Continue in session from day to day until all objections and relevant evidence have been heard and acted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)